Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-503
Audiologist, defined.

Audiologist means an individual who practices audiology and who presents himself or herself to the public by any title or description of services incorporating the words audiologist, hearing clinician, or hearing therapist or any similar title or description of services.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 189.